California statutes. Business and Professions Code
======================================================================
  Business and Professions Code
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Last Updated by State of California: October 03, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

GENERAL PROVISIONS

1.

This act shall be known as the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

2.

The provisions of this code in so far as they are substantially the same as existing statutory provisions relating to the same subject matter shall be construed as restatements and continuations thereof, and not as new enactments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

3.

All persons who, at the time this code goes into effect, hold office under any of the acts repealed by this code, which offices are continued by this code, shall continue to hold the same according to the former tenure thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

No action or proceeding commenced before this code takes effect, and no right accrued, is affected by the provisions of this code, but all procedure thereafter taken therein shall conform to the provisions of this code so far as possible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

No rights given by any license or certificate under any act repealed by this code are affected by the enactment of this code or by such repeal, but such rights shall hereafter be exercised according to the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

All persons who, at the time this code goes into effect, are entitled to a certificate under any act repealed by this code, are thereby entitled to a certificate under the provisions of this code so far as the provisions of this code are applicable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

Any conviction for a crime under any act repealed by this code, which crime is continued as a public offense by this code, constitutes a conviction under this code for any purpose for which it constituted a conviction under the act repealed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7.5.

(a) A conviction within the meaning of this code means a judgment following a plea or verdict of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere or finding of guilt. Any action which a board is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence. However, a board may not deny a license to an applicant who is otherwise qualified pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 480.

(b) (1) Nothing in this section shall apply to the licensure of persons pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3.

(2) This section does not in any way modify or otherwise affect the existing authority of the following entities in regard to licensure:

(A) The State Athletic Commission.

(B) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(C) The California Horse Racing Board.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this section controls over and supersedes the definition of conviction contained within individual practice acts under this code.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 995, Sec. 2.   (AB 2138)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the general provisions hereinafter set forth shall govern the construction of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

Division, part, chapter, article and section headings contained herein shall not be deemed to govern, limit, modify, or in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

Whenever, by the provisions of this code, a power is granted to a public officer or a duty imposed upon such an officer, the power may be exercised or duty performed by a deputy of the officer or by a person authorized pursuant to law by the officer, unless it is expressly otherwise provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

Writing includes any form of recorded message capable of comprehension by ordinary visual means. Whenever any notice, report, statement, or record is required by this code, it shall be made in writing in the English language unless it is otherwise expressly provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

Whenever any reference is made to any portion of this code or of any other law of this State, such reference shall apply to all amendments and additions thereto now or hereafter made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

12.5.

Whenever in any provision of this code authority is granted to issue a citation for a violation of any provision of this code, that authority also includes the authority to issue a citation for the violation of any regulation adopted pursuant to any provision of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1379, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13.

The term “materia medica” as used in this code or in any initiative act referred to in this code, means those substances listed in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, the official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, the official United States Dispensatory, New and Nonofficial Remedies, or the National Formulary, or any supplement thereof, except substances covered by subdivision (a) of Section 4052 and Section 4057 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 300.)
-------------------------------------------

14.

The present tense includes the past and future tenses; and the future, the present. Each gender includes the other two genders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

14.1.

The Legislature hereby declares its intent that the terms “man” or “men” where appropriate shall be deemed “person” or “persons” and any references to the terms “man” or “men” in sections of this code be changed to “person” or “persons” when such code sections are being amended for any purpose. This act is declaratory and not amendatory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

14.2.

“Spouse” includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 1.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15.

“Section” means a section of this code unless some other statute is specifically mentioned. “Subdivision” means a subdivision of the section in which that term occurs, unless some other section is expressly mentioned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

16.

The singular number includes the plural, and the plural the singular.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

17.

“County” includes city and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

18.

“City” includes city and county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

19.

“Shall” is mandatory and “may” is permissive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

20.

“Oath” includes affirmation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

21.

“State” means the State of California, unless applied to the different parts of the United States. In the latter case, it includes the District of Columbia and the territories.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

22.

“Board,” as used in any provision of this code, refers to the board in which the administration of the provision is vested, and unless otherwise expressly provided, shall include “bureau,” “commission,” “committee,” “department,” “division,” “examining committee,” “program,” and “agency.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.   (AB 2130)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

23.

“Department,” unless otherwise defined, refers to the Department of Consumer Affairs.

Wherever the laws of this state refer to the Department of Professional and Vocational Standards, the reference shall be construed to be to the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

23.5.

“Director,” unless otherwise defined, refers to the Director of Consumer Affairs.

Wherever the laws of this state refer to the Director of Professional and Vocational Standards, the reference shall be construed to be to the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

23.6.

“Appointing power,” unless otherwise defined, refers to the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

23.7.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, “license” means license, certificate, registration, or other means to engage in a business or profession regulated by this code or referred to in Section 1000 or 3600.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 1.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23.8.

“Licensee” means any person authorized by a license, certificate, registration, or other means to engage in a business or profession regulated by this code or referred to in Sections 1000 and 3600.

Any reference to licentiate in this code shall be deemed to refer to licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

23.9.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, any individual who, while imprisoned in a state prison or other correctional institution, is trained, in the course of a rehabilitation program approved by the particular licensing agency concerned and provided by the prison or other correctional institution, in a particular skill, occupation, or profession for which a state license, certificate, or other evidence of proficiency is required by this code shall not, when released from the prison or institution, be denied the right to take the next regularly scheduled state examination or any examination thereafter required to obtain the license, certificate, or other evidence of proficiency and shall not be denied such license,
 certificate, or other evidence of proficiency, because of that individual’s imprisonment or the conviction from which the imprisonment resulted, or because the individual obtained the individual’s training in prison or in the correctional institution, if the licensing agency, upon recommendation of the Adult Authority or the Department of the Youth Authority, as the case may be, finds that the individual is a fit person to be licensed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 2.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

24.

If any provision of this code, or the application thereof, to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the code, or the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

26.

Wherever, pursuant to this code, any state department, officer, board, agency, committee, or commission is authorized to adopt rules and regulations, such rules and regulations which are building standards, as defined in Section 18909 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be adopted pursuant to the provisions of Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code unless the provisions of Sections 18930, 18933, 18938, 18940, 18943, 18944, and 18945 of the Health and Safety Code are expressly excepted in the provision of this code under which the authority to adopt the specific building standard is delegated. Any building standard adopted in
 violation of this section shall have no force or effect. Any building standard adopted prior to January 1, 1980, pursuant to this code and not expressly excepted by statute from such provisions of the State Building Standards Law shall remain in effect only until January 1, 1985, or until adopted, amended, or superseded by provisions published in the State Building Standards Code, whichever occurs sooner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

27.

(a) Each entity specified in subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) shall provide on the internet information regarding the status of every license issued by that entity in accordance with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code). The public information to be provided on the internet shall include information on suspensions and revocations of licenses issued by the entity and other related enforcement action, including accusations filed pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) taken by the entity relative to persons,
 businesses, or facilities subject to licensure or regulation by the entity. The information may not include personal information, including home telephone number, date of birth, or social security number. Each entity shall disclose a licensee’s address of record. However, each entity shall allow a licensee to provide a post office box number or other alternate address, instead of the licensee’s home address, as the address of record. This section shall not preclude an entity from also requiring a licensee, who has provided a post office box number or other alternative mailing address as the licensee’s address of record, to provide a physical business address or residence address only for the entity’s internal administrative use and not for disclosure as the licensee’s address of record or disclosure on the internet.

(b) In providing information on the internet, each entity specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) shall comply with the Department
 of Consumer Affairs’ guidelines for access to public records.

(c) Each of the following entities within the Department of Consumer Affairs shall comply with the requirements of this section:

(1) The Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists shall disclose information on its registrants and licensees.

(2) The Bureau of Automotive Repair shall disclose information on its licensees, including automotive repair dealers, smog check stations, smog check inspectors and repair technicians, and vehicle safety systems inspection stations and technicians.

(3) The Bureau of Household Goods and Services shall disclose information on its licensees, registrants, and permitholders.

(4) The Cemetery and Funeral Bureau shall disclose information on its licensees, including cemetery brokers, cemetery salespersons, cemetery managers, crematory managers, cemetery authorities, crematories, cremated remains disposers, embalmers, funeral establishments, hydrolysis facilities, reduction facilities, and funeral directors.

(5) The Professional Fiduciaries Bureau shall disclose information on its licensees.

(6) The Contractors State License Board shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3. In addition to information related to licenses as specified in subdivision (a), the board shall also disclose information provided to the board by the Labor Commissioner
 pursuant to Section 98.9 of the Labor Code.

(7) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education shall disclose information on private postsecondary institutions under its jurisdiction, including disclosure of notices to comply issued pursuant to Section 94935 of the Education Code.

(8) The California Board of Accountancy shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.

(9) The California Architects Board shall disclose information on its licensees, including architects and landscape architects.

(10) The State Athletic Commission shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.

(11) The State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology shall disclose information on its
 licensees.

(12) The Acupuncture Board shall disclose information on its licensees.

(13) The Board of Behavioral Sciences shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.

(14) The Dental Board of California shall disclose information on its licensees.

(15) The California State Board of Optometry shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.

(16) The Board of Psychology shall disclose information on its licensees, including psychologists and registered psychological associates,
 psychological testing technicians, research psychoanalysts, and student research psychoanalysts.

(17) The Veterinary Medical Board shall disclose information on its licensees, registrants, and permitholders.

(d) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall disclose information on its licensees.

(e) The Structural Pest Control Board shall disclose information on its licensees, including applicators, field representatives, and operators in the areas of fumigation, general pest and wood destroying pests and organisms, and wood roof cleaning and treatment.

(f) “Internet” for the purposes of this section has the meaning set forth in paragraph (6) of subdivision (f) of Section 17538.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 2.5.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

27.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if a board within the Department of Consumer Affairs receives government-issued documentation, as described in subdivision (b), from a licensee or registrant demonstrating that the licensee’s or registrant’s legal name or gender has been changed, the board, upon request by the licensee or registrant, shall update the individual’s license or registration by replacing references to the former name or gender on the license or registration, as applicable, with references to the current name or gender.

(2) (A) If the board operates an online license verification system, upon request by a licensee or registrant whose name or gender was updated pursuant to paragraph (1),
 the board shall replace references to the licensee’s or registrant’s former name or gender with the individual’s current name or gender, as applicable, on the publicly viewable information displayed on the internet about the licensee or registrant. The licensee’s or registrant’s former name or gender, as applicable, shall not be published online.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, for licensees or registrants subject to subparagraph (A) who were previously subject to an enforcement action referencing the individual’s former name or gender, as applicable, the board shall not post enforcement records online, but shall instead post online a statement stating that the individual previously was subject to enforcement action and directing the public to contact the board for more information about the licensee’s or registrant’s prior enforcement action. The board shall ensure compliance with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing
 with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) in implementing this section, including, but not limited to, responding to a request for records within 10 days from receipt of the request, as specified in Section 7922.535 of the Government Code.

(C) If a public search of the online license verification system is performed using a licensee’s or registrant’s former name that was replaced pursuant to subparagraph (A), the board shall post an online statement directing the public to contact the board for more information about the licensee or registrant.

(3) If requested by the licensee or registrant, the board shall reissue the license created by the board and conferred upon the licensee or registrant by the board. A board shall not charge a higher fee for reissuing a document with an updated legal name or gender than the fee it regularly charges for reissuing a document
 with other updated information.

(b) (1) The documentation identified in either of the following is required to demonstrate a legal name change of a licensee or registrant:

(A) A certified court order issued pursuant to a proceeding authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 1277 of the Code of Civil Procedure and a copy of the certificate issued under the Secretary of State’s Safe at Home program authorized by Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code reflecting the licensee’s or registrant’s updated name.

(B) A certified court order issued pursuant to a proceeding authorized by Section 1277.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure or Article 7 (commencing with Section 103425) of Chapter 11 of Part 1 of Division 102 of the Health and Safety Code reflecting
 the licensee’s or registrant’s updated name.

(2) Any of the following documents are sufficient to demonstrate a gender change of a licensee or registrant:

(A) State-issued driver’s license or identification card.

(B) Birth certificate.

(C) Passport.

(D) Social security card.

(E) Court order indicating a gender change from a court of this state, another state, the District of Columbia, any territory of the United States, or any foreign court.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, all records related to a request by a licensee or registrant for a board to update the
 individual’s license or registration pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, all documentation described in subdivision (b), are confidential and not subject to public inspection or disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 225, Sec. 1.   (SB 372)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27.6.

The successor agency to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education shall transmit any available data regarding school performance, including, but not limited to, attendance and graduation rates, it receives from any schools under its jurisdiction to the California Postsecondary Education Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 642, Sec. 1.   (SB 599)    Effective November 2, 2009.   Became operative as provided in Sec. 5 of Ch. 642.)
-------------------------------------------

29.5.

In addition to other qualifications for licensure prescribed by the various acts of boards under the department, applicants for licensure and licensees renewing their licenses shall also comply with Section 17520 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 607, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, any board, as defined in Section 22, the State Bar of California, and the Department of Real Estate shall, at the time of issuance of the license, require that the applicant provide its federal employer identification number, if the applicant is a partnership, or the applicant’s social security number for all other applicants.

(2) (A) In accordance with Section 135.5, a board, as defined in Section 22, the State Bar of California, and the Department of Real Estate shall require either the individual taxpayer identification number or social security number if the applicant is an individual for a license or
 certificate, as defined in subparagraph (2) of subdivision (e), and for purposes of this subdivision.

(B) In implementing the requirements of subparagraph (A), a licensing board shall not require an individual to disclose either citizenship status or immigration status for purposes of licensure.

(C) A licensing board shall not deny licensure to an otherwise qualified and eligible individual based solely on the individual’s citizenship status or immigration status.

(D) The Legislature finds and declares that the requirements of this subdivision are consistent with subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(b) A licensee failing to provide
 the federal employer identification number, or the individual taxpayer identification number or social security number shall be reported by the licensing board to the Franchise Tax Board. If the licensee fails to provide that information after notification pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 19528 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the licensee shall be subject to the penalty provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 19528 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) In addition to the penalty specified in subdivision (b), a licensing board shall not process an application for an initial license unless the applicant provides its federal employer identification number, or individual taxpayer identification number or social security number where requested on the application.

(d) A licensing board shall, upon request of the Franchise Tax Board or the Employment Development Department, furnish to the board or the department, as applicable, the following information with respect to every licensee:

(1) Name.

(2) Address or addresses of record.

(3) Federal employer identification number if the licensee is a partnership, or the licensee’s individual taxpayer identification number or social security number for all other licensees.

(4) Type of license.

(5) Effective date of license or a renewal.

(6) Expiration date of license.

(7) Whether license is active or inactive, if known.

(8) Whether license is new or a renewal.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Licensee” means a person or entity, other than a corporation, authorized by a license, certificate, registration, or other means to engage in a business or profession regulated by this code or referred to in Section 1000 or 3600.

(2) “License” includes a certificate, registration, or any other authorization needed to engage in a business or profession regulated by this code or referred to in Section 1000 or 3600.

(3) “Licensing board” means any board, as defined in Section 22, the State Bar of California, and the Department of Real Estate.

(f) The reports required under this section shall be filed on magnetic media or in other machine-readable form, according to standards furnished by the Franchise Tax Board or the Employment Development Department, as applicable.

(g) Licensing boards shall provide to the Franchise Tax Board or the Employment Development Department the information required by this section at a time that the board or the department, as applicable, may require.

(h) Notwithstanding Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the
 Government Code, a federal employer identification number, individual taxpayer identification number, or social security number furnished pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to be a public record and shall not be open to the public for inspection.

(i) A deputy, agent, clerk, officer, or employee of a licensing board described in subdivision (a), or any former officer or employee or other individual who, in the course of their employment or duty, has or has had access to the information required to be furnished under this section, shall not disclose or make known in any manner that information, except as provided pursuant to this section, to the Franchise Tax Board, the Employment Development Department, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, a collections agency contracted to collect funds owed to the
 State Bar by licensees pursuant to Sections 6086.10 and 6140.5, or as provided in subdivisions (j) and (k).

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to utilize the federal employer identification number, individual taxpayer identification number, or social security number for the purpose of establishing the identification of persons affected by state tax laws, for purposes of compliance with Section 17520 of the Family Code, for purposes of measuring employment outcomes of students who participate in career technical education programs offered by the California Community Colleges, and for purposes of collecting funds owed to the State Bar by licensees pursuant to Section 6086.10 and Section 6140.5 and, to that end, the information furnished pursuant to this section shall be used exclusively for those
 purposes.

(k) If the board utilizes a national examination to issue a license, and if a reciprocity agreement or comity exists between the State of California and the state requesting release of the individual taxpayer identification number or social security number, any deputy, agent, clerk, officer, or employee of any licensing board described in subdivision (a) may release an individual taxpayer identification number or social security number to an examination or licensing entity, only for the purpose of verification of licensure or examination status.

(l) For the purposes of enforcement of Section 17520 of the Family Code, and notwithstanding any other law, a board, as defined in Section 22, the State Bar of California, and the Department of Real Estate shall at the time
 of issuance of the license require that each licensee provide the individual taxpayer identification number or social security number of each individual listed on the license and any person who qualifies for the license. For the purposes of this subdivision, “licensee” means an entity that is issued a license by any board, as defined in Section 22, the State Bar of California, the Department of Real Estate, and the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(m) The department shall, upon request by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, furnish to the chancellor’s office, as applicable, the following information with respect to every licensee:

(1) Name.

(2) Federal employer identification number if the
 licensee is a partnership, or the licensee’s individual taxpayer identification number or social security number for all other licensees.

(3) Date of birth.

(4) Type of license.

(5) Effective date of license or a renewal.

(6) Expiration date of license.

(n) The department shall make available information pursuant to subdivision (m) only to allow the chancellor’s office to measure employment outcomes of students who participate in career technical education programs offered by the California Community Colleges and recommend how these programs may be improved. Licensure information made available
 by the department pursuant to this section shall not be used for any other purpose.

(o) The department may make available information pursuant to subdivision (m) only to the extent that making the information available complies with state and federal privacy laws.

(p) The department may, by agreement, condition or limit the availability of licensure information pursuant to subdivision (m) in order to ensure the security of the information and to protect the privacy rights of the individuals to whom the information pertains.

(q) All of the following apply to the licensure information made available pursuant to subdivision (m):

(1) It shall be limited to
 only the information necessary to accomplish the purpose authorized in subdivision (n).

(2) It shall not be used in a manner that permits third parties to personally identify the individual or individuals to whom the information pertains.

(3) Except as provided in subdivision (n), it shall not be shared with or transmitted to any other party or entity without the consent of the individual or individuals to whom the information pertains.

(4) It shall be protected by reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the information to protect that information from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(5) It shall
 be immediately and securely destroyed when no longer needed for the purpose authorized in subdivision (n).

(r) The department or the chancellor’s office may share licensure information with a third party who contracts to perform the function described in subdivision (n), if the third party is required by contract to follow the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 2.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

31.

(a) As used in this section, “board” means any entity listed in Section 101, the entities referred to in Sections 1000 and 3600, the State Bar, the Department of Real Estate, and any other state agency that issues a license, certificate, or registration authorizing a person to engage in a business or profession.

(b) Each applicant for the issuance or renewal of a license, certificate, registration, or other means to engage in a business or profession regulated by a board who is not in compliance with a judgment or order for support shall be subject to Section 17520 of the Family Code.

(c) “Compliance with a judgment or order for
 support” has the meaning given in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 17520 of the Family Code.

(d) Each licensee or applicant whose name appears on a list of the 500 largest tax delinquencies pursuant to Section 7063 or 19195 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be subject to Section 494.5.

(e) Each application for a new license or renewal of a license shall indicate on the application that the law allows the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration and the Franchise Tax Board to share taxpayer information with a board and requires the licensee to pay the licensee’s state tax obligation and that the licensee’s license may be suspended if the state tax obligation is not paid.

(f) For
 purposes of this section, “tax obligation” means the tax imposed under, or in accordance with, Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7280), Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 7.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

32.

(a) The Legislature finds that there is a need to ensure that professionals of the healing arts who have or intend to have significant contact with patients who have, or are at risk to be exposed to, acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS) are provided with training in the form of continuing education regarding the characteristics and methods of assessment and treatment of the condition.

(b) A board vested with the responsibility of regulating the following licensees shall consider including training regarding the characteristics and method of assessment and treatment of acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS) in any continuing education or training requirements for those
 licensees: chiropractors, medical laboratory technicians, dentists, dental hygienists, dental assistants, physicians and surgeons, podiatrists, registered nurses, licensed vocational nurses, psychologists, physician assistants, respiratory therapists, acupuncturists, marriage and family therapists, licensed educational psychologists, clinical social workers, and professional clinical counselors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 381, Sec. 4.   (SB 146)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

35.

It is the policy of this state that, consistent with the provision of high-quality services, persons with skills, knowledge, and experience obtained in the armed services of the United States should be permitted to apply this learning and contribute to the employment needs of the state at the maximum level of responsibility and skill for which they are qualified. To this end, rules and regulations of boards provided for in this code shall provide for methods of evaluating education, training, and experience obtained in the armed services, if applicable to the requirements of the business, occupation, or profession regulated. These rules and regulations shall also specify how this education, training, and experience may be used to meet the licensure requirements for the
 particular business, occupation, or profession regulated. Each board shall consult with the Department of Veterans Affairs and the Military Department before adopting these rules and regulations. Each board shall perform the duties required by this section within existing budgetary resources of the agency within which the board operates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 214, Sec. 1.   (AB 2783)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

40.

(a) Subject to the standards described in Section 19130 of the Government Code, any board, as defined in Section 22, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California may enter into an agreement with an expert consultant to do any of the following:

(1) Provide an expert opinion on enforcement-related matters, including providing testimony at an administrative hearing.

(2) Assist the board as a subject matter expert in examination development, examination validation, or occupational analyses.

(3) Evaluate the mental or physical health of a
 licensee or an applicant for a license as may be necessary to protect the public health and safety.

(b) An executed contract between a board and an expert consultant shall be exempt from the provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(c) Each board shall establish policies and procedures for the selection and use of expert consultants.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand the scope of practice of an expert consultant providing services pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 339, Sec. 1.   (SB 541)   Effective September 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. DEPARTMENT OF CONSUMER AFFAIRS [100. - 472.5.]



CHAPTER 1. The Department [100. - 144.7.]

100.

(a) There is in the state government, in the Business and Consumer Services Agency, a Department of Consumer Affairs.

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.
